Washington statutes.
RCW 3.38.031

Districting plan—Transitional provisions.

As a part of the districting plan, the county legislative authority shall designate a date on which the terms of the district judges of the county shall end.

For each judicial position under the districting plan, the county legislative authority shall appoint a person qualified under RCW 3.34.060 who shall take office on the date designated by the county legislative authority and shall serve until the next quadrennial election of district judges as provided in RCW 3.34.050.

Pending cases, proceedings, and matters shall be transferred to the appropriate court as provided in RCW 3.74.900.

[ 1984 c 258 s 26; 1965 ex.s. c 110 s 3.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.